Oklahoma, session 2025, SB339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3218.14, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3218.14. Each A. Except as provided for in subsection


B of this section, each institution and constituent agency shall


have the option to recommend to the governing board and to the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education fees and tuition to be


charged to students enrolled at the institution or constituent


agency. The fees and tuition shall not exceed the limits


established by law. The State Regents shall consider and if


appropriate, shall approve the recommendations of the institution or


constituent agency pursuant to Article XIII-A of the Oklahoma


Constitution.

Req. No. 1362 Page 1


B. Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the tuition and


fee rates to be charged to students enrolled at an institution


within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education shall not


exceed the tuition and fee rates approved by the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education for the 2024-2025 academic year.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1362 EB 1/2/2025 4:57:11 PM

























Req. No. 1362 Page 2